Hawaii, session 2026, HB1836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that adequate fire protection infrastructure is essential to safeguarding lives, homes, and natural resources throughout the State.  In rural land use districts within the county of Hawaii, significant gaps remain in the availability of fire hydrants, due in part to large geographic areas, existing water infrastructure, and the cost of installing new hydrant systems.  These conditions can hinder efficient emergency response and increase the risk of loss during wildfires, structure fires, and other emergencies. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds as a grant-in-aid to the county of Hawaii to provide grants for the contracting of a private water company for the facilitation and installation of fire hydrants within rural land use districts. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 as a grant-in-aid to the county of Hawaii to provide grants for the contracting of a private water company for the facilitation and installation of fire hydrants in rural land use districts. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the county of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________